Biker reacts at lightning speed and prevents worse.
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the highway between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured injured thanks to his rapid reaction.
Car ist overlooks
A 44-year-old driver wanted to turn left from 21.30 30 with her VW coming from Merklingen left onto Landesstraße 1230 towards MachMachtolsheim.
She overlooked the 24year year-old motormotorcyclilist from coming towards Nellingen.
During the collision, hand and foot brake levers fly fly away.
The biker still tried to avoid the car, but still touched it at the rear vehicle area.
Due to the strip process, the hand and foot brake levers were torshed on the Suzuki and the driver was no longer able to brake.
At present, he controlled his motorcycle in the green stiffers next to the road and let it roll out there without falling down.
Bker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker suffered an injury to the and had to be be treated in a clinic
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 harvesters infected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming, Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are under quarantine and are no longer allowed to leave the..
A security service monitors the ban on outlife..
A total of 174 harvesters were tested during the series investigation for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2, as reported by the district amt Dingolfing-Landau on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further spread, we unfortunately have to take this step to protect the population," said Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already infected in the company - this was the occasion of the series test
The farm is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for intion glasses.
Mamming is a rural municipality with a good 3300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep calm:: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected were separated by uninfected employees, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
Greens and SPD gave co-responsibility to the state government.
The two opposition groups accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neneglecting the control of the shelters of seasonal workers.
"This can take bitter revenge if such local infection events take out and regional lockdowndowns have to be arranged," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary managing director of the Greens..
The SPD looks very similar to this: "After the CorCorona outbreak in the Wiesenhof-slaughthof in mid-May we have already called for a special control programme for farms with harvers," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, hygiene conditions at the workplace and the conditions and the housing must be sharply controlled.
This obviously did not happen "".
The outbreak came "with announcement"
Underground station Aidenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute:: 19-olds falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at AAidenbachstraße subway station, a 19-year-old fell through a thrwer and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a dispute between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße idenbachstation at 4.15 p.m.
A passers-by alerted the police, who approached with several strips..
According to the investigation, a Munich man (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the platform edge and fell into the track bed.
People from the group of the 17-year-old helped the proron to climb out of the track.
There was no danger from an an coming railway.
As the police say, there were clashes between the two people
The 17-year-old initially fled from the crime scene, but his personal details could be determined in retrospect.
Accompanied by his father, he went to police inspection 29.
Against the 17-year-old is determined for bodily injury.
Report: Seehofer pushes for longer data retention
Data retention is currently suspended.
However, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period after a media report.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for extended data retention after a media report - instead of the planned ten ten weeks half a year
As the "Bild am Sonntag" reports, Seehofer Minister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked in a letter a quick amendment in the law.
Seehofer therefore wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it makes sense to "make make urgently needed adjustments to the law", quotes the newspaper from the letter.
Data retention is currently currently suspended..
A decision of the ECJ is expected.
Seehofer, however, wants the changes in advance, so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could only only be meaningfully examine whether legal adjustments were needed if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the countries, had already in favour of data retention in June.
NBA: Stripclub trouble for clipper star Lou
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), baskLos Angeles Clippers basketball professional, is said to have left the headquarters at Disney World in Orlando, Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he still visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit to ESPN N, is back in Isloation, is tested daily on Covid-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for exactly these Wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta, usually) have the best Wings in town"..
NBA insiinsider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA Williams ordered a ten-day quarantine.
The Clippers star missed the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the best 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season finale starting night on Friday.
Söder expresses itself after mass infecton about the Corona situation
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has frightened up authorities and politics..
Almost 500 harvesters from several countries currently work on the large vegetable farm, more than a third has infected with the Corona pathogen
The farm is now under quarantine and is closed with a building fence.
Nobody can leave the site, food is delivered.
The authorities now offer the good 3300 inhabitants of the municipality free Corona tests.
Since the harvesters had little contact with the local population, the district office so far assumed that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Conmorse": confession of the alleged ararson of
"My client has been cooperative," said lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper
The defender added: "He greatly regrets the deeds, the confession was a liberation for him"
His mandate was "plagued by remorse and very taken away by the extent of the destruction"
In the event of convicconvic, according to the prosecution, the man is threatened with ten years imprisonment and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes had been severely damaged by a fire the night of Saturday last week.
The fire had broken out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests confirmed the suspicion of arson
The now imprisoned suspect had been arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after one day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent penetration into the church, he quickly came into view of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss defining conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates completed facts," said Grindel the "picture on Sunday"
He stressed: "For the clubs, which can most dangerous dangerous Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not not work anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkverk..
In this respect, one can not get around the debate whether it is not necessary to facilitate facilitate clubs that want to break into this phalanx into the involvement of investors ".
However, he has doubts about whether there is a willingness in the German Football League to allow majority investments that are prohibited in the the Bundesliga by 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences in a European internal market around the Bundesliga as a business location," said Grindel.
The former DFB CEO sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure ensure more competitive balance in the Bundesliga will ultimately only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but do lead lead to excitement in the championship".
Even an equal distribution of TV funds will not achieve a decisive
"FC Bayern makes sales of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
So the differences are already immense among the first three clubs alone.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
With regard to the past, Grindel feels betrayed..
"Unfortunately, there were people who noticed noticed this mistake and stabced to the press instead instead of talking to it," said Grindel about the adoption of an expensive watch that had led to his resignation in April 2019.
"This has already occupied me humanly".
He received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian official.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences from it," said Grindel..
"I dealt with the ominous watch gift completely transparent and unsusp
Many in the the DFB knew about it ".
He had never "made a secret out of the gift," the the 58-year-old assured.
"This may be called naive, at least this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption"
"Black Lives Matter": injured and a
The protests against police violence in the United States have essenated by Donald Trump's use of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, there were clashes between demonstrators and policemen in various cities.
In Louisville, three people were injured, and 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots while a demonstration march was just crossing a intersection.
Previously, there were clashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including officials from the Federal Police, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and forcibly diverated demonstrators.
Hundreds, partly armed demonstrators marmarched through Louisville in Kentucky on Saturday and demanded that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held accountable.
The 26-year-old student was shot shot in a drug raid in her apartment in Louisville ville in March.
The goal of the raid was someone else who did not live there at all, and no drugs were found..
When a member of a member of a group calling itself as an armed alliance of black Americans a shot on Saturday, three people were injured.
According to the station NBC, they were taken to the hospital..
None of them were in in danger
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had also formed.
In the end, the two groups did not not meet.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died as part of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police took a suspect into custody.
She has not given more information on the circumstances circumstances of the act so far.
Mayor Steve Adler said according to the New York Times that he was, like many in the city, "inconsolable and stunned" of what had happened.
In the American metropolis of Seattle, demonstrators also clashes with the police on Saturday.
They set construction cars on fire in front of a youth prison, and the police used glare grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police officers or assault.
A courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of demonstrators had hit windows, shot down fireworks and blinded police officers with lasers, said the Oakland police on late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd that demonstrated on a highway..
As the police reported, one of the demonstrators fired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital.
In addition, windows were also broken in a court court and a fire was laid, as the police reported.
Investigation began
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy
Although the great sause in the spa town was missing, visitors and peractors enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: The Rakoczy weekend without RakRakoczy festival..
But: Even if the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program highlights highlights such as Saale burns, Rakoczyball or procession, many came got their money's worth with the Corona-alternative program.
"I think we managed to spread Rakoczy flair," says Spa Director Sylvie Thormann
The guests would have received it well..
In principle, one return to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, as well as only the historones were in the focus of the festival..
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has been visiting her husband at the Rakoczy festival Bad Kissingen for more more than 25 years
So again this time in the Corona year.
The couple have made themselves comfortable at Luitpold Casino, watch the historthings while strolling and listens to Cuban live music at the casino restaurant
"I also find it so pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She miss the crowds that otherwise do not belong to Rakoczy.
However, you lack the usual the usual program highlights, especially Saale is burning burning on Friday evening as well as the historic procade and the final fireworks on Sunday evening..
"That's a pity.
The weather would have fit this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament tournament to take place again
For the actors of the historic spa guests, the alternative program sometimes meant more work.
For example for Christina Gold, who particippart in the procade in a normal year and can be there on the carriage of the Kurgarten cafcafé.
This year she was on Saturdays and Sundays on Saturdays in the city.
"This's more exhausting, otherwise we have it easier," she says
The equestrian club had less to do, even even individual individual riders were on the road in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will take place again again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years of break in 2021, a Rakoczy riding tournament would take place.
28 Corona cases in Spanish Fuenlabrada
The Spanish football division club CF Fuenlabrada slides deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak
Since the newcomer from Madrid had flown to game in the city of A Coruña despite the first Corona cases on 20 July, one low low follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been tested positive, one came to the hospital, as the club
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid still had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs
Now even the relegation to the B-group of the Second League is threatens.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at last moment, the prosecprosecor's office investigated for a possible crime against public health, the highest sports authority CSD is considering the forced descent of the club.
Players and other team members are quarantined in a hotel
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they not received a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS"
The photos show how players had hung underwear and club clothes in in their rooms in the hotel for dry after they they apparently had to wash them themselves.
The bed linen was not changed for five days
Another problem is the food.
Neither it good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The club stay, on the other hand, that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The club's charge of Javier ately endangas as was rejected by the club's lawyer, Javier Tebas Llanas.
They had not violated the Corona rules established by the Football Association, stressed the son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas,, as the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca".
Before the departure, there were four infected persons until 19 July, but they were were isolated and did not travelled with them.
Directly before the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members had been tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the Corona Test test was positive for "five or six other team members.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kick-off, said Tebas Llanas.
Police must capture horses torn out in steam compartment
Two animals were on the
The police led her back to their owner
On Sunday morning shortly before 6 o'clock, a road user shared two free-running horses on the feeder between the Donnersdorf Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway junction Theres.
At the arrival of the officials, the horses were already between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
After the trust of the horses could be won by the officials shortly before steam compartment, they had a rope carried carried in the patrol car.
Proclist Tony Martin: Career continuation can imaginable
Time trial specialist Tony Martin thinks about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time trial world champion Tony Martin can imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am setting the framework conditions with the team how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung
Martin is currently working for the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considering his career after this year before the Corona break.
The negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said..
Or about other problems that would plague him as a family father, Martin said.
He used to get up up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly back to the wheel."
Today I think as the father of a little daughter: What if "
The professional clist acknowledged that there were aspects with which he is increasingly difficult
"But it was good to remember based from the Corona time what what I have about cycling and how much fun he has for me."
The time trial specialist returns to the event at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets on the
The beautiful weather attracts bikers to the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour ends fatally.
An 18-year-old pedestrian dies
Schönthal - In case of accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was captured on Saturday near Schönthal (district Cham ham) by a car that came to the
Why the car got on the opposite lane was unclear at first.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old colded together on his machine with a horse-drawn carriage on Saturday.
According to police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left turn he boashed ed the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the carriage, a man was seriously and a man was slightly injured, as the police reported.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Upper Palatinate of Bad Kötzting.
He had laid on a street on the night of Sunday and was run by a 42-year-old driver.
After to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could not brake in time
At Schönberg (district Freyung-Grafenau), Saturday a 57-year-old year-old biker boashed against a car in a right turn despite full braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the remaining three people in the car were uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister of Transport Kerstin Schreyer (CSU). Bavaria
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests announced for August against driving bans, Gabor Kovacs, the minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection on guardrails and the defuse of dangerous curves.
"We have achieved a lot for the safety of motormotorcyclists in recent years," the letter.
"The number of motorized two-cyclists killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011"
Kovac tests with Monaco against
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac there will soon be a reunion with new Club AS Monaco with Eintracht Frankfurt.
The eight-time French champion will perform on 1 August (6 p.m.) the Hesse, the former club of the Cro
For the Bundesliga, it is the first and only hardurance test before the second leg in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without a spectators.
"We are especially looking forward to this game.
It's always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
This is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Prior to moving to FC Bayern Munich, Kovac trained the Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led to the victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us with regard to the match against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt residents, I am looking forward to seeing again with Niko Kovac, "said Eintracht coach AdHütter..
The 50-50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat at the Eintratracht.
In March, the Frankfurter Frankfurter had lost the eight-final first leg against Basel in their own stadium with 0 – 3.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past the lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of well-known Corona new infections has further increased on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person recovered and no longer falls into these statistics) to 47 on Sunday
There is also a case in the city of Hof
Thus, the Hof area approaches the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 dead by monsoon rain in Sou
The severe floods in Southeast Asia affect more than 9 million people, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the strong monsoon rain, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent in boats to reach the isolated people in boats.
Entire villages are under
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Armored horos in National Park die from landslides des
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank horos died from landslides.
They are under protection and applicable as endangered with extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists lead back to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of of the most hit countries by global warming.
New apartments
In the village of Cox's Bazar in the south Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 displaced by the floods.
So far, only a few have moved.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazaar.
The enthusiasm is in Grenezn.
If you used to have a house, it was so small and resembled a hut, often not not want to spend their life in a large block of
Many apartments are empty, but are - as the government wants - soon soon be occupied from those who have lost their house due to the floods.
60 Corona new infections in just one day
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 Corona new infections were reported in Vienna - there were 22 new new infections in Lower Austria.
The Landessanitätsdirektion Vienna and the medical crisis staff of the city of regularly provide information about the current case figures and other key figures for the Covid-19 virus: as of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8 00 a.m., 4,840 (+ 60)) are confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths associated to the virus remains un204.
4,090 (+ 48) persons are recovered.
22 new Coronavirus infections in Lower Austria.
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria rose en by 22 to 3,288 on Sunday Sunday.
According to the medical staff, a patient has recovered
This increases the number of people recovered to 2,936.
Currently Covid-19 currently had 247 patients in the federal state.
To date, 147,253 tests have been carried out..
105 people died in connection with lung
Argentina rejects counter-offer from creditors tors
The new demands could not be met, the the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires announced on Saturday.
"That would be not only irresponsible, but also unjust," said a statement...
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debts of the second largest economy in South America are no longer viable under the current conditions..
That is why Argentina calls on its private creditors to waive some of its claims of around 66 billion US dollars (around 59 billion euros).
If there is no agreement, the country is again threatthreatened the state bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth payment failure in Argentine
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However, the Argentine government mainto its last offer and is not ready for further concessions
Argentina is in a serious financial and economic crisis
The inflation rate was more than 50 percent
For the current year, experts expect a decline in economic strength of around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not paid interest receivables of $503 million and had slipped into a limited payment default.
Arrived professionally - privately not privately
"It's super well" - this conclusion drawn by Dr. Stefanie Kramer after her first days in the notary in Eggenfelden..
In the end, everything went very quickly: In mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller in the Eggenfelden notarioffice.
Just six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the lawyer with doctorate began the work, the normal daily day business has long been running on full speed.
"However, I still have to arrive privprivately," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs..
The short lead time was of course not not enough to shift the center of life from Regensburg to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingfingerin.
She is currently with her husband, who works in Regensburg as a judge at the district court, looking for a suitable apartment or house in the city.
At least her husband was still able to apply for parental leave at short notice in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to have to commute from Regensburg every day,, she for the time also have an accommodation with her parents in Dingolfing, the 39-year-old explains.
Growing up in the neighboring district, the city of Eggenfelden has of course been to it for a long time.
During visits on site with her family in recent months, she has stated: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more more pleased that she made the race in the selection process for the vacancy.
Her homeland Lower Bavaria also plays a central role in Dr. Stefanie Kramer ’ s professional career: After studying the law in Passau, she completed her traclineeship and the 2nd state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assesstor, including in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen in the Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also also ouloulher her her doctorate in labour law - she took her first job as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau.
In 2016, she went on parental leave, followed by her move to Regensburg.
Since then she has taken over representation services in various notarial positions.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she had seen the right time for the full professional re-entry, the 39-year-old explains.
The team of its predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation in the notariate office in the future, has taken over Dr. Stefanie Kramer - and immediately has a praise for the team of the law firm: "It is going super well!"
The fact that she can rely on well-rehearsed processes makes it easier for her to take care of the upcoming relocation of the private center of life.
In terms of kindergarten or crib places, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And everything works as desired, she hopes to be able to pursue her hobby here soon - and get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans to the league type with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be 20 filled at the start of the season in case of a fan return.
"Due to the distance control, which is mandatory to comply with, we are to current date with 12,000 to 15,000 spectators," said Borussia Dortmund's Managing Director Carsten Cramer, the "Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena in the district city holds just than 81,000 spectators at Bundesliga matches.
In the ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic last season, BVB had lost around four million euros per game.
The cramer responsible at the BVB for marketing, digitization and internationalization, that, in addition to the normal spectators, some some of the 4,4000 places in the hospitality sector can be opened: "It is of course a bblow into the office when these revenues break break completely".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone is currently "well advised to take a a stable side length".
"If many companies are not doing well well and 6.8 million people are in short-time work in Germany alone, then the need is limited to entertainment," explained Cramer..
The Dortmund Marketing boss praised the BVB professionals for their salary waiver, which is intended to help overcoming the crisis: "Of course, the players know that their salary waiver has a different effect than when we on 100 people in merchandising in merchantime work".
Tiny miras: Early start into life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a packer of butter, just three tablespoons of blood in his entire body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 premature ies, which are cared for annually at the Graz Children's Clinic.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme lightweight with not even a kilogram of birth
They are so small and born so early that neither lungs nor intestines nor muscles are fully developed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they could hurt the electrodes of a ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll clothing and specially made mini diapers for them.
But not so small that they were not in voice - "and how", Berndt Urlesberger.
"Even if they don't don't scream as noloud as big babies".
When the whiteboard becomes
Despite Corona theatre in the classroom: The whiteboard as a stage experienced the 9th grade of of St. St. James us Gymnasium in Abtstsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented to the students the production "Das Heimatkleid" - via video
Afterwards, the students were able to exchange ideas with the actress and the director Winfried Tobias about the play and the performance.
The idea for the performance format from the current Corona ona situation born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of
Even though in the end all involved agreed that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage room would offer even additional stimms, the theatre can also sees the potential for contact with the schools.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," stressed director Winfried Tobias
First round drawn: The TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB-Pokal
If the TSV 1860 qualify for the DFB-Pokal, the lions will meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB Cup is
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in a successful qualification
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD sports show
Because the field of participants is yet complete due to the Corona pandemic, placeholders were used in the draw
Due to the voluntary renunciation of semi-final opponent FC Memmingen, TSV 1860 is already the final of the Bavarian Toto Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburger Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
If second division side Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be qualified for the first round in the DFB-Pokal
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalligist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB -PCup will be held between 11 and 14 September and thus one week before the third division start.
"Gone with the wind": Film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
The film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died of natural death on Sunday at at the age of 104, confirmed her spokeswoman of the German Press
de Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Vom Winde verweht" (1939).
Born in Tokyo as a British parents in Tokyo, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her out big alongside Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films films with the breaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the lead role "To Each His Own".
The film was released in Germany under the title "Mother Heart"
Three years later, the award came as Best actress in William Wyller's "The Heiress"
She was also received much recognition as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "The SnSnake Mine".
Daphne du Maurier proposed her in 1952 for the lead role in the adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play was a worldwide success.
With her longtime friend Bette Davis, she played in "Lullaby for a Corpse".
His marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 to 1953) was the son Benjamin.
In Paris, de Havilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had the daughter Gisèle with him
This marriage also broke.
Rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath ath were never confirmed
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / winders miss final at Comeback
The World Cup second Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost in the semifinals to their national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Thole / Wickler last last played at the World Tour Final in Rome September.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerors EEhlers / Flüggen lost against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde a defeat 0 – 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played at the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand: the tickets secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers vers.
Kalbitz ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf" "
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is from the perspective of the FDP is only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said the FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin..
The Federal Arbral Court of the the AfD confirmed on Saturday in Stuttgart after several hours of trial the expulsion of Kalbitz, which the Federal Board had decided by majority in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD parliamentary group in the Brandenburger Landtag.
"If the AfD really were about consistently removing removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries such as Björn Höcke and his supporters would long been been excluded," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will will in the AfD, because right-wing extremism now belongs to the party"
Similarly, CSU General Secretary Markus Blume said: "The fact that Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded says nothing and does not change anything," he told the "world on Sunday".
"Rather, it speaks volumes how many frenetic supporters a right-wing extremist still in in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assumes that the AfD will land again below five percent in in the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are counted".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially officially dissolved dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state state and group chairman Björn Höcke; the Protection of the Constitution classifies the coronation as "secured right-wing extremist iration".
In May, the AfD federal board Kalbitz Kalbitz out of the party.
As a reason he stated that Kalbitz had not stated an earlier membership in the in the now now bannbidden far-extremist "Heimattreuen Deutsche Jugend" (HDJ) and with the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the Left group in in the Brandenburg Landtag, Sebastian Walter, stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbral Court did did change change the character of the AfD: "" The wolf only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without Kalbal ".
Neither this decision weakens the federal party nor the right wing.
"The manoeuvre of the Meuten troupe is transparent.
One wants to escape further observation by the Protection of the Constitution and to get through under the radar, "said Walter
"The AfD doesn't get rid of the spirits s she called.
A expulection does not change yet, "commented Brandenburg SPD General Secretary Erik Stohn on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here, the AfD Landesassociation and the faction still held their right-wing leader".
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue
He announced on Saturday that he would now take action against the decision of the Federal Arbral Court under civil law.
North Sea wind farms supply a good 21 percent more electricity
The wind power plants on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours into the grid in the first six months of the year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, the network operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the forwarding through the German electricity grid
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which are not part of Tennet's grid area, have fed another 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
Overall, the wind power from the North and and Baltic Sea thus comes to 13.73 TWh compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind flow in Germany, about about four percentage points more than a year ago
New wind farms provide higher
The increased contribution of offshore wind energy results in in addition to wind conditions from higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have gone to the grid in the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were all run simultaneously with full power,, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity
The transmission capacity is sufficient for this; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatt.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we have been investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore grid connections," said Tennis Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot not exploit their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent
The previous record day this year is January 2, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could supply almost seven million households.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold at the Galerie des Gmünder Kunstverein
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold blew up the usual frame after the Corona break.
Many more art lovers than usual followed the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper
The musical equivalent was the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz..
North of the gallery was the association "Sandtogether".
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled for Corona
The Windbergfest does not take place this year.
The city of Freital cancelled the three-day festival planned in September..
In other years, over 30,000 people had visited this city
"We have truly not made this decision easy easy and - in aware of how difficult it is economically for the participants - hophoped until the last minute," explained Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-partisan).
"But ultimately, as as organizers, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people" "
If tens of thousands of had fcked to the festival grounds and the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking could not have been met in accordance with the current Corona protection regulation.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that not much would been left of a folk festival.
In addition, the organizational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately many many times over..
Rumberg consoled next next year.
Then the city of Freital will celebrating its 100th anniversary, among others with the Winterbergfest from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of the Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - The six time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg scored four victories at four starts at four starts.
After winning won a Grand Prix at the start with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was not be atable on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth prevailed on Sunday in the special against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen len.
Also in the freestyle, the Germans was clearly on Quantaz on Saturday of their 34-year-old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Wer's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix
For Quantaz it was the first freestyle ever.
Already at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had won all important four exams.
The last of the three international tournaments is planned for 14 to 16 August.
More air traffic controllers in Worms Worfuture
The Worms University continues into the air: The "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" provides a professorship for "Air Traffic Management"
A corresponding contract between the university and DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and starts in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to enable the start of the studies not only in summer, but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities of both university in the university and at the DFS Air control Academy are utilized.
The DFS will advise the university on the establishment and occupation of the professor
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students have been in part of their training as air traffic controller at Worms University University of Applied Sciences in the course of Air Traffic Management.
This year, nine students started.
So far, the experience of DFS are very positive, the achievements of the students are excellent
The combination of studies and pilot training makes a contribution to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, promotion is not economically easy for us.
However, we firmly expect air traffic to rerecover and grow again in the long term.
In order to be able to fulfil our legal contract in the future, we need highly qualified staff, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman Managing Director of DFS at the signing of the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a futproof investment that will provide air controllcontrollers with a broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue the good cooperation with the university and at the same time underpin our attractiveness as an employer ".
This is underby Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University of Applied Sciences Sciences: "The endowed professorship is an important bridge between science and industry
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor's programme in Air Traffic Management ".
The trust of the German Air traffic control is both motivation and commitment for the Worms ms University of Applied Sciences to further expand its teaching and research expertise in the future fields of air transport.
In use for the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university can set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students with the first owed owed professorship for a dual degree programme.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing and Culture, emphasises: "The focus on Worms University Applied Sciences, its focus on Worms, has a unique selling point in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university "..
Rescue screwdriver lands on the A 45
About 30 minutes, the A 45 motorway was fully closed on Saturday in the direction of Aschaffenburg, as the rescue helicopter was was in use after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove with with a Ford at 12.40 a.m. at the exit Alzenau-Mitte Mitte in the bend and landed at the guardrail..
Due to the impact, the front tairbags triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were cared for by the emergency doctor and the patient flew to a hospital with the rescue helicopter
At the moment however, the police assume assume that there is no danger of life.
The damaged vehicle, which caused a damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed
Heil wants to test other industries by meat industry
The Corona crisis once again brought to light the conditions in parts of the meat industry..
Law tightighations are imminent
But are they right - and will it remain
Federal Labour Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) also wants to review other industries according to the now planned strict regulations against grievances in the meat industry.
"We will look at the industry for industry and then take suitable measures for the respective industry if necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers already warn against restricting work contracts
After the mass Corona outbreak at the meat giant giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Large slaughterhouses should no longer allowed to use external personnel in sslaughter, decomposition and meat processing.
To this end, the use of work contracts and temporary workers there is be banned there.
Employer 'President Ingo Kramer told the dpa: "Finger away from a general restriction of work contracts and workers employment employment, if one does not want to completely stranggle the economy completely".
Factory contracts, for example, are the basis basis for their value creation for the customer areas of the trade, the construction industry and plant engineering.
"The misakes of individuals cannot destroy such an important important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to ban works contracts everywhere in the German economy"
Work contracts make sense.
"If an industrial company instructs a craftsman to install a safety system, this is a normal work contract".
The German meat industry considers a ban on works contracts and temporary temporary work alone in its industry alone be be constitutional constitutional.
It is not explable why other labour law should be apply to the portioning and packaging cheese in the future than Wurst, says a statement on the legislative project, as to the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday).
In the event of a ban, the consumer price would increase by 10 to 20 percent per kilo and product.
Many ften East Eastern European employees from plant contracworked in in the industry according to the results of an examination of the NRW Arbeitssafety verwaltung partly 16 hours a day.
They often had no break
Wage has been withtained for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation at the accommodation of employees was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law came into force for the meat industry in 2017.
But, these were bypassed by "tricky constructions".
"Now we must be cleaned dy".
The politician announced: "In the Occupational Safety and Act, which we want to decide in the cabinet at the end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates in occupational safety safety or clear criteria for Community accommodation".
The draft before the dpa includes amendments to the Act on Securing Workers' Rights in the MeIndustry and the Occupational Safety and Health Act.
Brandenburg's Consumer Protection Minister Ursula Nonnemacher (Greens) considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us to able to take even more controls in many supervisory areas: food controls, animal welfare, everything possible, for example, animal transport," said NNonnemacher on Sunday in the RBB show "Brandenburg aktuell"
But more controls also require more staff staff
Three dead in the crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
In the crash of an ultralight aircraft on an apartment family house in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia, three people, three people died.
A child was slightly injured..
Two other people were rescued injured injured in the accident, said a spokesman of the district control center Wesel.
According to the accident, a parachute was found, according to the police
The "Rheinische Post" reported, con eyewitnesses that before the crash, the aircraft collided with a hot air balloon.
The house is a single or two-family house
Further details were not known at first.
eviction of Frankfurter Opernplatz
A week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacution of the opera field was also peaceful during the night of Sunday.
Finally, a few dozen people stayed on the square, but left him at 1 o'clock before the curfew.
The police had been working since the early evening with numerous officials, and a larger police squad could be seen throughout the city city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight night, a ban on ban for the opera square, where riots had occurred a week ago.
Policemen had been attacked with bottles from the crowd of celebrants.
At least five officers were injured after police entries, and several police vehicles were damaged.
The night of Saturday was also quiet.
Car flips over: Young woman seriously injured in an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeigeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old year-old suffered serious injuries on Sunday at 1.25 p.m.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade was looking for possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman was travelling on Bundesstraße 83 towards her residence of Hümme, when her car got away from the road for previously unexplained cause and fell several times.
In order to save the accident, the fire brigade had to cut the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether there was still in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched from the rotary ladder with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone squadron ron from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, was also ordered for the search for persons.
However, the emergency ers found no anyone between the high corn plants.
The seriously injured was taken with the ambulance to the Kassel clinic for further care.
Almost 50 forces of the fire brigade Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg were on site
The federal road was closed for two hours due to
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal by Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time in series.
The team around the five-time world football player made made the 36th Scudetto of the club history with a 2 – 0 (1-0) on Sunday evening in the home game against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 – 0 before the half
With 83 points, Turin, which competed without the last injured injured former player Sami Khedira, is no longer displaced of first place two match days before the end of the season Serie A season.
The Inter Milan is seven points behind.
Juventus was harmless despite optical optical superiority in the first half, then Ronaldo met the last action after a free kick variant.
The 35-year-old used an addition of Miralem Pjanic directly from the penalty limit directly with a flat shot (45th + 7).
Ronaldo was also involved in the 2: 0 against the now offensive guests, after his shot Federico Bernardeschi (67 7th) dusted.
This secured the lackluster, but decisive success..
The foulelmeter shot at the latte in the 89th minute minute may have have ed only Ronaldo himself with a view to the Torjjhäger classification.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically for 90 minutes at ball
The games are strange, and momentum changes very slightly, "explained coach Maurizio Sarri after 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve coach...
Because to the defeat, the Turin had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
Juve owe the sassuring lead at the top the top of the table to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the SSarriteam had only five victories.
Whether Ronaldo also becomes top scorer is questionable
While the Portuguese superstar scored 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund Ciro Immobile already has 34 goals on his account after his three-of the 5: 1 (1: 1) of the fourth fourth fourth Lazio Rome at HellHellas Verona - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is held by the current juve professional Gonzalo Higuaín..
The Argentine scored 36 goals for SSC Naples in the 2015 season.
In August, the next title chance awaits the "Old Lady" of Italian football
Juventus is in the round of 16 of the Champions League, but has to make for a 0-1 first page on 7 August against Olympique Lyon to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as an opponents..
Baden-Württemberg: Over 250 illegal car
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened penalties and court rulments, drivers continue to accelerate on countless illegal races on the Baden-Württemberg roads: Last year and the first four months this year, the police have already registered more than 250 illegal illegal car races.
There are no comparative for the years years, but the speazers are increasingly doing work for the judicial authorities: At the prosecutututors between Konstanz and Mannheim, a total of 155 investigations investigations were in 2018 for illegal races, one year later it was already 252 and in the current year until the the beginning of 1.
The races were less about organized events, as shown from the answer of the Ministry of Interior to a request from the Landtag -SPD
In most cases, the drivers spontananeously against each other or they had fled from the police - this is also reported as an illegal race.
The wheel was mainly German men between the ages of 18 and 60
113 fines - 15 times
Only in comparatively few cases are the speabers caught and also asked to pay out: According to the Ministry of the Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed and 15 prison sentences since 2018.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other drivers reacted more sensitively before because of the many tragic accidents and processes of past years and reported more often, said a sperial man okesman.
Again and again, drivers brake brake the traffic in order to get space space and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen riders were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 riders on the A8 at Merklingen
A81 is the most popular "
On the A81, the police register even more races than on any other federal
With a speed limit, attempts are made to slow down the speeders on the particularly affected section between EnEngen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and ppewed sports and luxury cars often have Swiss license plates, because the drivers switch to Germany wn laGermany due to the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in the neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few distances: "With a general limit of 130 kilometers kilometers per hour, we would create this problem problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliamentary group.
"The inhibition threshold for Rasazer would be significantly higher if you were not be on the road here and there legally with 200 kilometers per hour hour and more".
Rivoir considers less of of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Anywho disregards all the rules in such a way and risks not not one's own lives, but also the lives of other road users, is hardly achievable with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger crackthrough of the police
On the other hand, this is not enough for the ADAC: "We assume that Raser er cannot be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and harder controls on the affected routes
Not infrequently, the high-touring showstrength becomes becomes painful and momentous serious: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people have nationdied in the races, of of two unparticipants in a nightly crash in Stuttgart's city center and one in Gerlingen.
In November, two young men are said to have delivered a car race there there.
One of the vehicles came off from the road, clashed a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people have been injured in the races of the past two years
However the according to Interior Minister Thomas Strobl, however more sharpenter penalties are not necessary: "Legislature need for action to order sanction illegal illegal motor vehicle harder is not seen," says the paper of the of the Interior.
Blue light from 23 July: Thirsty burglar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack ack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw)) and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in the Talstraße at around m. in the Tal40 and ran towards the snack..
There he noticed a man who used with drinks on the fridge and left the snack bar through a previously entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police, the burglar also used a checkout and stole cash in the low three-digit range
The suspect is described as follows: he is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of a strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black trousers and bright shoes.
The police accept further witnesses
Ackermann sprints on the final stage at Sibiu Tour
Proclist Pascal Ackermann won his second victory of the day on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatine of Team Bora-hansgrohe prevailed on the 109-kilometre long section with start and finish in Sibibiu in the mass sprint, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
These was the season victories three and four for Ackermann.
In the overall classification, his Austrian team mate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed.
The 26-year-old had confidently decided the mountain time trial in the morning and thus took over the top in the class..
Only 104 riders had competed for the final stage in the evening..
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann explained after his success on
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters from the finish, he simply attracted his sprint, "and it also worked out perfectly".
According to the rules of the World Association UCI, a Corona test was conducted by all participants and their companions six days before the start of race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisors in isolated hygiene bubbles were separated from the organizational team and the media.
Viewers at start and finish were not allowed
Head center gave instruction on amateur resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment building, a child (4) suddenly lay lifeless in the water.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call was received at shortly before 13 o'clock.
"A control center disper immediately gave instructions on lay ateur reanimation," said a fire refgman man told BILD.
The incoming rescue workers took over the resuscation measures a little later.
The child floating in life danger was transported to the university clinic under resuscitation.
Why it was unclear.
The police have routinely started the investigation into the accident.
The fire refokesman: "We assume a tragic accident in the apartment"
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1,100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people participated on Saturday "a" tuning meeting "in the parking lot of a furniture store.
The police implemented their announcement to control such events.
A big tuning meeting came on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg berger Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the Middle Franconia, at around 10.30 p.m., the Nuremberg traffic Police found an increased volume of vehicles in the area of a large parking parking lot on Ingolstädter Straße.
The police then took a large number of vehicle controls.
Only recently had the police announced that they would take action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only a small part from the "scene" "
The officials counted at the top a good 700 vehicles and about 1,100 people, accounting for the police.
However, only a small part of the present present be to be buted to the "autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene followed the police appeal
Based on the vehicles and people on site, it be assumed that these were mostly onlookers.
In addition, the majority of those present adhered to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular the compliance with the minimum distance and the wearing of mouth-nose protection.
The control measures carried out on site ended around 1: 00 a.
In total, the officials found such structural changes in 10 vehicles that the operating licence had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be ensured.
No
There were no no illegal car races..
"The Central FranconFranPolice Centre will continue to keep an eye on the events and continue to carry out increased control measures, also in connection with the emerent of onlookers people," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger of the towing company involved: "They all have beautiful rims, we must not scratch them," says Schrödinger.
Special tapes would be used for this purpose.
Also because the cars are wider, the company has to to care not not to any damage..
"The young people should finally get their cars back without scathed".
Figures from the Employment Agency: 900 suspicion cases of abuse in short-time time work
Berlin - The Federal Employment Agency (BA), to BA statement, investigates around 900 susppiccases of abuse in short-short-time worker allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have reported short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, responsible for the operating business, of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung".
When at the beginning of the Corona crisis, many companies had suddenly applied for short-time work, the BA had to react quickly.
Normally the test takes up to three weeks
"So much time was not available to us in this hot phase..
We will look all the more look at the final accounts
There will certainly be a lot
We are not naive and have a long breath "
Indications of abuse would often come from the affected employees or trade unions.
In addition, the BA uses analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible wave of insolvency in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year??
The assessments differ, but we prepare ourselves for the event of the case and already train our employees in the employment agencies for processing applications for insolvency money "
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach..
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in the New Garden dissolved
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 p.m. by the district drivers of the Foundation Prussian Palaces and Gardens (SPSG), the foundation announced at PNN request.
The young people left the park
On Saturday evening, some young people had played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow was evicared by territorial drivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of the foundation there are always accumulations in which the distance and hygiene rules Covid-19 contact Ordance ance are not with.
At the end of June there was a celebration with about 300 people in the Babelsberg Park, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without coronaverarrangement, the parks are closed at nightfall.
The camp on the meadows is prohibited according to the park regulations, there are only few exceptions.
The foundation has been complaining for some time that visitors would leave more and more garbage and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, illegal park parties have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neuködistrict, 5,000 people celebrated an illegal techno party on the night of Sunday.
The event was disbanded by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona eruption in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist resort of St. Wolfgang
The number of confirmed cases rose to 48, as the state authorities in Linz
More than 100 results were pending in the evening.
Accordingly, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has been tested positive.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 11 pm.
"There are cancellations and ellations there and there" of bookings, said the head of the Tourism Association, Hans Wieser, der dpa
Some guests also left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 nights last year.
In a normal season, about a third of guests are Germans
On Friday, the first infections had become publicly known..
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended on Saturday the behavior of interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and might have infected there.
"We all liked to do that in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to raise young employees aware of the dangers of Covid-19
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July were contacted.
The eruption evokens memories of the Austrian ski and party resort Ischgl in Tyrol, which was a center of the Corona spread throughout Europe throughout the early the of phase of the pandemic.
In total, more than 1500 people are currently currently infected with the virus
The new infections focus on Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions
London (dpa) - The English football record champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence..
The Red Devils secured third in the on the last match day of Premier League by a 2-0 0 (0-0) victory against direct val Leicester City.
The foxes must now be content with the Europa League because Chelsea FC passed by and also qualified for the premier class.
In the fight against the descent, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United was led by a penalty by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute)
After a Red card for Leicester City in the extra season, Jesse Lingard (90th + 8) reached the final.
Chelsea, in the Champions League round of 16 opponent of Bayern,, thanks to Mason Mount (45th + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45th + 4) parallel with 2 – 0 (2-0) against Wolverhampton Wanderers.
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is also in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal in his first season as Chelsea coach.
Tottenham Hotspur also also benefited from Chelseas victory over Wolverhhampton, who passed the the Wolves with a lean 1: 1 (1: 0 at Crystal Crystal Palace and starts as sixth sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the long-distance duel with Watford and AFC Bournemouth, but had to tremble for class West West Ham United for a long time.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84) immediately compensated Andrey Yarmolenko (85.
The 1: 1 (0 – 0) was enough because Watford lost 2 – 3 (1: 3) at Arsenal..
The club, which hved three coaches in the season, relegated after five first division years.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save herself by a 3-1 (2-1) at Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool, which has been been as the English champion since the end of June, secured a club record with a 3-1 (1 – 1) victory at Newcastle United.
99 points are the highest value the Reds have ever achieved in a football season season
Coach Jürgen Klopp with his team narrowly missed the points record in English football.
Manchester City holds the record with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season..
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) played the game for Liverpool.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season," said goscorer van Dijk after the game, "" that should spire us to defend the title. "
It will be difficult ".
In the end, the Premier League bosses were satisfied.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football in England was interrupted from 13 March to 17 June
In the meantime, even premature demolition or a outcome of the games on neutral ground was discussed.
Finally ually, however, the season could be played without special events - but as in Germany without spectators ators in the stadiums
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netany
The protests in Israel against Prime Minister Netanyahu are becoming increasingly fierce.
At night there were violent clashes.
On the night of Sunday in Jerusalem, the Israeli police violviolently against participants participants in a demonstration against right-wing conservative Prime of Binyamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people had were arrested for participate in riots, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld said.
Among other things, the police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
According to media reports, a total of around ,000 people had gathered near Netanyahu on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu's handling with the Corona crisis..
The protesters beat drums, blew into horns and called on Netanyahu to resign..
Participants in a counter-demonstration arrested who supported Netanyahu, reported the news page "ynet".
Also in many other places in Israel, people, including in front of the head of government's private villa in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to was arrested, a man was arrested Tel Aviv because he is suspected of spraying pepper from a moving car on demonstrators on the roadside.
Another man was arrested after a knife attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country
The protator was slightly injured on the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv, there have recently been several demonstrations against Netanyahu..
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Most recently, Netanyahu was also criticized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
Among other things, he is accused of prerapid loosening and a lack of preparation for a second Corona wave..
The Corona crisis has made it difficult to to the country's economy..
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel recently rose to ever new records.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter crashes on car - nine injured - Ruhr area - Bild
Ahlen - A rear-end lilicaused nine minor injuries injuries on Saturday afternoon on the B58 at Ahlen.
A driver was with her two children (3, 5) towards towards Beck.
The police: "Probably she had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn".
The driver of a Mercedes transporter who drove behind her must have have seen late.
He crashed on the back of the
In the accident, three occupants were injured in the car and six in the transporter.
Several ambulances took her to a surrounding hospital
North Korea loels border city after Corona suspicion
North Korea has so far saw in its own measures to defend the coronavirus a "luminous success".
Now the country reports for the first time on a suspicion
Due to a first official Corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely sealed a major city for fear of a disaster
Despite the strictest epidemiological defensive measures over the past six months, "the malicious virus may have been introduced to the country country," the state media reported.
For the region around the border town of Kaesong, the state of emergency was imposed.
The communist leadership proclaimed the highest level of alarm.
If the suspicion is confirmed, it would be the first official case of infection with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
North Korea had not yet registered a single infection infection and described its defensive as a "luminous success"
The information was doubted abroad..
The disease symptoms were reportedly edly identified in a "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on 19.
The person resigned for South Korea three years ago and has now returned across the border..
For the border crossing within the four kilometwide wide and largely reduced military buffer zone, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea.
However, according reports from the national news agency Yonhahap, South Korea's military admitted the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea.
There were investigations on some people.
According to North own, North Korea called for an urgent meeting of the Politburburof the Labour Party of the workers Saturday, chaired by ruler Kim Jong Un.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe"..
Kim had already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate every district and region from others," it continued.
The person concerned and all people in Kaesong who had had contact with him had been quarantined
The central military commission of the party is therefore to investigate the "outbreak" and the conduct of the responsible military unit unit and, if necessary, impose harsh punishment.
According to estimated, about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Excitement before Council meeting: City-East and noise protection are still still under discussion before a great summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also vote on the development plan for the major project Innenstadtentwicklung-Ost project," says casually in the middle section of the municipal press release for the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, 28 July, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the Congress Centre Pforzheim.
However, the appreciation of the eastern city is particularly controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently in individual committees, depending on the presence.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT), the project developed developed from the citizenship and then by by administration and the municipal council not not fail after almost almost ten years of preparation, ticized project opponent Reinhard Reinhard Klein as "extra-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "deigation" and "deliberfalse false statements".
"Everyone thinks they know better," says Klein, who has been part of the municipal council for a year as the only representative of the Pforzheim citizen list for a year.
In fact, after reading the contracts, he is in this position: "I know what I'm talking about"
The exit comes the city cheaper,, the Technical Town Hall is contrary to statements of the city administration after grants, whose existence Klein Klein is convinced to renovated for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than one predicted in the town hall and by the proponents from business.
Designing the city through its own strength and not an investor: This is his plan B. B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED faction, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also enprovides for the renovation renovation of the Technical Town Hall, the open closure of the Schßberg, the rental of the former valley for administrative areas and a small-part inner center transformation, ideally with local carriers.
Environmental issues play a
In addition, environmental issues will play a central role.
Among other things, the municipal council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of Pforzheim from health noise pollution, caused by road traffic, including temporary reduction..
In a press release, the local transport club of Germany welcomes the widespread introduction of speed / 30 30. However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent of the fact that must must so, because they through neglglect in car traffic and thus the bus traffic with thinned cycles and have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus to noise, according to the VCD.
The municipal council also coordinates on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda is accession to the Climate protection Pact of the State of Baden-Württemberg, the redefinition of the parental contributions in the urban daycare institutions and the application for admission to the federal federal's smart city funding.
Citizens are welcome, but they to heed Corona protection measures..
Tim Zimmermann starts the new season with a lot of delay
With almost half a year of delay, Tim Zimmermann starts his premiere season in the ADAC GT Masters on 31 July.
Before the league of supercars can take up regular operation, the first test drives were now due.
For Zimmermann, it was about getting to know his LamLamborghini Huracan GT3.
The Corona crisis has long a time prevented Tim Zimmermann from tackling his first business trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the Porsche from the preseason," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go differently into the curves differently.
But it really was a lot of fun ".
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years, the, the Dutman has been in GT sports and was been able to help his new teammmate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I get dazzling and we have also made enormous progress from session to session at Lausitzring.
Exactly there - at Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also host its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supercars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 new newcomers, knows the track. However.
In 2015, he was most last guest at the Motodrom..
"It worked quickly and I had to get get used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafen racing community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to hit optimally to be fast".
How fast Zimmermann really really is, turns out in two weeks..
"Of course, the teams play a little during the tests," he says
"In the end, we are very satisfied and are looking forward to the first weekend at Lausitzring" ".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude to a densely packed calendar.
Seven races will be scheduled by the beginning of November.
The current currently is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, ex-Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will reach the GT GT wheel.
British Transport Minister of Quarantine Decision cold caught
According to press government, the decision to quarantine Spanish holiholidaymakers two weeks on their return, according to press reports, cold caught the country's s minister of transport.
Accordingly, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, while while his colleagues decided the measure at home on Saturday.
Because of the rising rising Corona figures in Spain, the cabinet in London removed the country from the list of those countries from which entry without quarantine requirements.
The new regulation applies from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures on returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are just holiday on the deadline, only from Saturday, August August, and was not introduced overnight.
By the way, Spain is so far regarded as one of the "safe countries" for which no quarantine is required in Austria
"Numerous ministers may have known in advance that there is a possibility of quarantine on holidaymakers on Spain," commented Labour MP Diane Abbot.
"But apparently no one has made the effort to tell Grant Shapps"..
Less under a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain Spain and the expiry of the strict curfew, the number of infection in the country is increasing again.
Virologists mainly blame the nightlife for the renewed
Spain is one of the favourite holiday countries of the British..
The British government currently advisadvisagainst not necessary travel travel to the Spanish mainSpain, the Canary Islands and Balearic Islands are particularly popular with British holidaymakers are excluded from this.
To date, more than 272,000 infections have been registered with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 deaths.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces hypersonic weapons for war
Russian President Vladimir Putin announced on the Navy Day in his country country an equipment of the warships with the modern hypersonic weapons.
With these unique weapons in the world would expand the combat possibilities of the Russian naval forces, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central Marine Parade.
According to the fax fax, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the hypersonic ic missile built for the Navy.
The hyperpersonic weapons have many multiple of the speed of sound of around 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo will continue to be built.
It is also built on the atomatomically usable underwater torpedo Poseidon, it was said.
The planned sea drone is planned to destroy coastal targets.
The president, who himself also sailwith a military boat, said that this year alone, 40 new ships would be commissioned by the individual fleet units of of the largest country on earth.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Navy has been been protecting ably, Putin said at the day celebrated by sailors.
Also on many other Russian coastal towns, the naval forces celebrated the Navy Day with parades.
In Syria, where Russia fights alongside ruler Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated strength at a a gun show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu..
Ammunition was also fired there.
A video in a video published by the Ministry of Defense included not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets..
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: help difficult for Corona
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season across the Atlantic has landland in Texas.
Lilife-threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, said the US NOAA National Hurricane Center Center in the night to Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared a state of emergency for many districts.
The Corona pandemic, rampant in Texas, complicate the work of the helpers, Abbott continued continued, according to the US media.
Evacuated called for caution
"Every hurricane is an huge challenge," AbAbbott said according to Houston Chronicle
With regard to the cyclone in Texas, he added: "This challenge is complicated and is exacerbated considering it sweeps through an area that is the most affected affected by Covid-19."
According to Johns Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in Texas a result of the Corona pandemic.
Abbott called on people who had to leave their homes to caution.
They should not disregard practices "we have accustomed to", such as wearing masks, the governor said according to CBS.
It is important that everyone kept away
Therefore, hotel rooms were also provided in some places.
In addition, be tested on Corona in emergency shelters.
Damage was initially reported reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield
Storm warning withdrawn
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was hit according to authorities hit on the island of Padre Island directly off the Texas coast on land.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the hurricane of the lowest level one.
For the stretch of coast from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm surge warning had initially been issued and later withdrawn..
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" moved further further inland and headed to the northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" moves in Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" was elled the Hawaii the night on Sunday with wind speeds of about 150 kilometers per hour towards Hawaii.
However, the hurricane center expected it to weaken.
According to the prediction, it should be on Sunday (local time) near the largest islands of Hawaii - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Above the Atlantic, NOAA expected an above-average active hurricane season this year following a forecast from May.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes were expected, of which up to six very strong cyclones could be declared.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year across the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
Given the available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the likelihood of a normal season is only 30 percent, which of a below-average even only ten percent, it was said at the time.
US President Donald Trump wrote via Twitter that his government was watching the storms and was in contact with the states concerned
Four goals stristrioked: Video assistant "" punished "Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were stripped of two
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals strivoked: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven black evening at 0 – 2 (0: 1) at SSC Naples in the Italian football league A - and was really angry at the video assistant of the speaker.
"A festival of ungiven gates for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never gone so so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport "..
Host Naples had taken lead through a goal of defdefender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic initially cheered the balance.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) took drew the hit due to a side position..
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball back into the net - again the VAR intervened.
The gates of attattackers Francesco Caputo (50.) and Domenico Berardi (61.) also returned by the referee team after reference from the VAR.
In the extra time, Allan made the 2 – 0 final score perfect for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo.
"The VAR is worse for Sassuolo than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team
The new technology ensures records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern München: Pav
Munich (dpa) - The start into the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for FC Bayern with a setback.
The Hansi Flick "reasonably recovered after a short holiday and a few days, Hansi Flick has to think after the first team training, how he can rebuild his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes of ments behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midmidfielchief Joshua Kimmich, suffered a band injury at the left of of foot and threatens to be missing in decisive king class duels.
In the Munich dirty weather, the right-defender broke off a training game and was driven from the course with a golf kt
How long the unrestricted regular player must pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the quart-16 second leg against Chelsea on 8 August should likely be difficult possible, the 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament in Lisbon on 12 August in Lisbon.
The Bavarians do not want to be stopped by the mishap from the training on Sunday.
Flick called in his personal triple formula the three attributes he wanted to see from his stars on the way to Portugal's capital
Quality, intensity and concentration are intended to show his victhungry title collectors in the ideally following 28 days until the king class class final on 23 August.
"We have simply mastered the compulsory tasks with championship and trophy excellently.
Now it's time to create the special thing, "said Flick.
Until the Munich people can can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, but first the the eight-final duty against Chelsea is due.
After the 3: 0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners in the home arena should not become a Bavarian nightmare again as in the lost "Finale dahoam" in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and recharge confidence with a good game, "demanded Flick
A test for match will scheduled on Friday against Olympique Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had 13 days holidays after the double double, to a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players around Edel-Einkauf Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues on the the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy has fit well like all the new new ones," Flick reported..
But instead of talking about the new season, if Sané & Co. are longer allowed allowed train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, team strength are now trained for the Londoners, who are in the rhythm in contrast to the click ensemble.
After that, the Munich people could face a quarter-finals against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, in the semifinals Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus are possible opponents
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not so easy," stressed the head coach, who from Tuesday can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training
The World Cup sector scorer Klose and Flick know of many joint tournament preparation, which which is particularly important in the 0 to 100 attunement.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure", praised Flick.
The "focus on winning" is an impressive characteristic of his team.
The tournament with nine-teams teams was also went ambitious to the matter on Sunday.
Of the performers, everyone were there, including the emigrant Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts is not secured beyond the royal class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world
Since it cannot drive on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
However, all American races were cancelled.
Race calendar is becoming increasingly concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula One season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix, three more race tracks were added the week.
In October, will be drive at the Nürburgring in Germany and in Portimão, Portugal.
On the first of November Lewis Hamilton and Co. will fight for World Championship points on the traditional traditional race track in Imola.
This means that the race calendar calendar includes 13 races according to current status.
"We are pleased that we continue to make great progress in completing our our 2020 season plans," said Formula 1 oss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races will be completed to be completed in the premier class in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final race calendar will be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Prior to the official races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, media media reports, performances in Vietnam and Malaysia could still take place at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
The regulations of Formula 1 require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Cup.
Even if, as currently planned, only is driven on two continents, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles citing "extraordinary circumstances" because of the coronavirpandemic
The traditional start to the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled at short notice due to the looming coronak crisis.
A return to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Cancellation meets criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being with them again next season," Carey said
The rejection of the American races came with criticism, especially in Brazil: "The cancellation was was not surprising for us, but we can not accept the reasons for this," said Tamas Rohonyi, promotpromoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
The number of infection in the São Paulo area is significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil
The concerns of some teams about not wanting to drive in Brazil would not justify any rejection.
We is prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg talked about her meeting with US President Donald Trump. "
Greta Thunberg was a guest on Stephen Colbert's famous well-known Latenbert per video video and and revealed in an interview what she had in mind during her encounter with Donald Trump.
Climate ata journalist Greta Thunberg was a guest in a popular US Latenight show.
Among other things, she told about about her fight against the powerful of the world.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil look" during her encounter with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement
Now she spoke in a well-known Latenight show about her plans in the future and her meeting with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg on Tuesday on your show and conducted a longer interview with the Swedish.
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to direct focus away from the climate crisis," she shaken.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats just because a group of children take to the streets," she experienced.
Heads of state and leaders who mock against them on social media or even try to silence them, find her "funny", as show her the reactions, "since they have no other answer to it.
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview when Greta Thunberg was addressed to a well-known scene in in which she took a bitterly evil look after US President Trump.
At the 2019 UN Climate Summit in New York, for which the Aktvisa sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip created a GIF, i.e. an animated image, which ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president?
To the relatively disclosed question of Stephen Colbert, she answered answered briefly and dry: "To be honest, I think that requires no further explanation".
The experienced satirist Colbert probably probably not expected the the quickatable answer and disappeared briefly laughing from the picture.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmund Immobile with pack of three for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden Shoes with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski
The former Dortmund Ciro Immobile also has the best chance of becoming top scorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB professional scored three goals in the 5 – 1 (1 – 1) victory of Lazio Rome at Hellas Verona, including two turned penalty in the extra times of both halves
The 30-year-old now has 34 season goals on his account from the fourth fourth two season matches before the end - just as many did Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern Munich in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy, Cristiano Ronaldo follows with 30 goals so far, the Portuguese superstar met Sampdoria Genoa with the leader in the evening.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green
His life was like a roller coaster ride: After a rapid ascent with Fleetwood Mac it went steeply downhill and then slowly up.
Now the blues rock guitarist Peter Green has died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult pendant: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is
He died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, family members on Saturday in an official statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days
Top musicians like Peter Frampton praised Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all former and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and guitarist Green had founded the now long-legendary band in London in 1967, to this day his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross" ".
The End of the musician ("" In The Skies ") was bled a a ride was a roller co
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes but then without him.
It is said to there were said to among, disputes, because Green wanted to donate all the profits of the group for charity.
He began to perform in wide roments and with a large crucifix.
Mental problems are also said to have played a role.
Three years after its founding, Green Green left the band in 1970.
This was followed by a social descent..
The blues rock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During a majority of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene of the.
He is said to have lived temporarily on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent for a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946, the son of a Jewish working-class family in Bethnal Green, London.
At a young age he was enthusiastic about US blumusicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven he learned the first guitar
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing guitar professionally and five years later got the chance to stand on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He was later engaged as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton for the Bluesbreakers.
In the middle of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967 with his bluesbreakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross" composed by Green gave the group the first number hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted them to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid ascent soon showed his dark sides: Green did not cope with the media bustle, his experiments with the drug LSD became increasingly more extreme
He later commented on life between music and adaddiction in an interview: "The worst thing happened to me in life are the drugs - the best thing was to land a number 1 hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green surprisingly achieved a success in 1979 with an album inspired by religious themes.
Meanwhile, Fleetwood Mac swam without him in new formation on a wave of success.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" sold more than 40 million copies worldwide
Despite various small solo successes, Green did not make a comeback, until he started in 1996 with a group of friendly musicians
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke of a rock star returned to Earth
Free of drugs, Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts he was already a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound one of the most influential guitarists of recent decades.
